Alaska, session 34, SB210.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 14.03.015 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 04 (b) It is the policy of the state that 05 (1) every state resident be encouraged to learn about the distinct and 06 unique cultural heritages of Alaska Natives and American Indians in a culturally 07 responsive manner; 08 (2) when providing instruction, implementing an educational goal, or 09 adopting a rule related to the education of state residents, a local educational 10 institution work cooperatively with tribes in the state or tribes in close proximity to the 11 state to include information specific to the cultural heritages and contemporary 12 contributions of Alaska Natives and American Indians, with particular emphasis on 13 Alaska Native and American Indian tribal groups and governments in the state; and 14 (3) all school personnel have an understanding and awareness of 15 Alaska Native and American Indian tribes to help personnel relate effectively with 01 Alaska Native and American Indian students and parents; every local educational 02 institution shall consult and contract with local tribal entities to provide the means by 03 which school personnel will gain an understanding of and appreciation for Alaska 04 Native and American Indian people. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.